Georgia, session 2025_26, SB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 17 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to notaries public,
is amended by revising Code Section 45-17-31, relating to persons authorized to have
notarial acts performed by commissioned officers, as follows:
"45-17-31.
(a) Any person who (1) is a member of the armed forces of the United States, (2) is serving
as a merchant seaman outside the limits of the United States, or (3) is outside the limits of
the United States by permission, assignment, or direction of any department or official of
the United States government in connection with any activity pertaining to the prosecution
of any war in which the United States is then engaged and the spouse, dependent child, or
other dependent of such person may have instruments acknowledged, documents attested,
S. B. 299
- 1 -

LC 46 1169
oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and affidavits executed, and other notarial
acts performed by any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the
United States.
(b) Any person who is a member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty
in any capacity may also utilize a remote, online notary public duly licensed in any state
of this country to notarize any forms or documents required by state or local agencies for
matters involving taxation, titling, and licensing of a motor vehicle. This provision shall
not apply to any documents involving the conveyance of real estate, wills, or trusts, or to
motor vehicles not intended for personal use by the service member or his or her family."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 299
- 2 -